language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 390 Y 23
SFX 390 0 a .
SFX 390 0 ach .
SFX 390 0 achmej .
SFX 390 0 achmy .
SFX 390 0 achu .
SFX 390 0 am .
SFX 390 0 ami .
SFX 390 0 ašo .
SFX 390 0 aštej .
SFX 390 0 ašćo .
SFX 390 0 e .
SFX 390 0 i .
SFX 390 0 o .
SFX 390 0 om .
SFX 390 0 oma .
SFX 390 0 omej .
SFX 390 0 omy .
SFX 390 0 otej .
SFX 390 0 ow .
SFX 390 0 owu .
SFX 390 0 ośo .
SFX 390 0 oš .
SFX 390 0 u .
SFX 391 Y 27
SFX 391 0 ach .
SFX 391 0 achmej .
SFX 391 0 achmy .
SFX 391 0 achu .
SFX 391 0 ašo .
SFX 391 0 aštej .
SFX 391 0 ašćo .
SFX 391 0 e .
SFX 391 0 i .
SFX 391 0 ijo .
SFX 391 0 ijom .
SFX 391 0 ijomej .
SFX 391 0 ijomy .
SFX 391 0 ijotej .
SFX 391 0 ijośo .
SFX 391 0 ijoš .
SFX 391 0 iju .
SFX 391 0 im .
SFX 391 0 imej .
SFX 391 0 imy .
SFX 391 0 itej .
SFX 391 0 iśo .
SFX 391 0 iš .
SFX 391 0 mej .
SFX 391 0 my .
SFX 391 0 tej .
SFX 391 0 śo .
SFX 392 Y 13
SFX 392 0 a .
SFX 392 0 ach .
SFX 392 0 am .
SFX 392 0 ami .
SFX 392 0 ich .
SFX 392 0 im .
SFX 392 0 ima .
SFX 392 0 imi .
SFX 392 0 oma .
SFX 392 0 ow .
SFX 392 0 owu .
SFX 392 0 u .
SFX 392 0 y .
SFX 393 Y 14
SFX 393 0 a .
SFX 393 0 ach .
SFX 393 0 am .
SFX 393 0 ami .
SFX 393 0 i .
SFX 393 0 ich .
SFX 393 0 im .
SFX 393 0 ima .
SFX 393 0 imi .
SFX 393 0 oma .
SFX 393 0 ow .
SFX 393 0 owu .
SFX 393 0 u .
SFX 393 0 y .
SFX 394 Y 16
SFX 394 0 a .
SFX 394 0 ach .
SFX 394 0 am .
SFX 394 0 ami .
SFX 394 0 eg .
SFX 394 0 ego .
SFX 394 0 em .
SFX 394 0 emu .
SFX 394 0 o .
SFX 394 0 oju .
SFX 394 0 om .
SFX 394 0 oma .
SFX 394 0 ow .
SFX 394 0 owu .
SFX 394 0 u .
SFX 394 0 y .
SFX 395 Y 15
SFX 395 0 a .
SFX 395 0 e .
SFX 395 0 ej .
SFX 395 0 eje .
SFX 395 0 eju .
SFX 395 0 ich .
SFX 395 0 im .
SFX 395 0 ima .
SFX 395 0 imi .
SFX 395 0 o .
SFX 395 0 og .
SFX 395 0 ogo .
SFX 395 0 om .
SFX 395 0 omu .
SFX 395 0 u .
SFX 396 Y 24
SFX 396 0 o .
SFX 396 0 og .
SFX 396 0 ogo .
SFX 396 0 ogokuli .
SFX 396 0 ogož .
SFX 396 0 ogožkuli .
SFX 396 0 om .
SFX 396 0 omej .
SFX 396 0 omkuli .
SFX 396 0 omu .
SFX 396 0 omukuli .
SFX 396 0 omuž .
SFX 396 0 omužkuli .
SFX 396 0 omy .
SFX 396 0 omž .
SFX 396 0 omžkuli .
SFX 396 0 otej .
SFX 396 0 ośo .
SFX 396 0 oš .
SFX 396 0 u .
SFX 396 0 ym .
SFX 396 0 ymkuli .
SFX 396 0 ymž .
SFX 396 0 ymžkuli .
SFX 397 Y 27
SFX 397 0 a .
SFX 397 0 ach .
SFX 397 0 achmej .
SFX 397 0 achmy .
SFX 397 0 achu .
SFX 397 0 am .
SFX 397 0 ami .
SFX 397 0 ašo .
SFX 397 0 aštej .
SFX 397 0 ašćo .
SFX 397 0 e .
SFX 397 0 eju .
SFX 397 0 i .
SFX 397 0 im .
SFX 397 0 imej .
SFX 397 0 imy .
SFX 397 0 itej .
SFX 397 0 iśo .
SFX 397 0 iš .
SFX 397 0 mej .
SFX 397 0 my .
SFX 397 0 oma .
SFX 397 0 ow .
SFX 397 0 owu .
SFX 397 0 tej .
SFX 397 0 u .
SFX 397 0 ćo .
SFX 398 Y 27
SFX 398 0 a .
SFX 398 0 ach .
SFX 398 0 achmej .
SFX 398 0 achmy .
SFX 398 0 achu .
SFX 398 0 am .
SFX 398 0 ami .
SFX 398 0 ašo .
SFX 398 0 aštej .
SFX 398 0 ašćo .
SFX 398 0 e .
SFX 398 0 eju .
SFX 398 0 i .
SFX 398 0 im .
SFX 398 0 imej .
SFX 398 0 imy .
SFX 398 0 itej .
SFX 398 0 iśo .
SFX 398 0 iš .
SFX 398 0 mej .
SFX 398 0 my .
SFX 398 0 oma .
SFX 398 0 ow .
SFX 398 0 owu .
SFX 398 0 tej .
SFX 398 0 u .
SFX 398 0 śo .
SFX 399 Y 6
SFX 399 0 ch .
SFX 399 0 chmej .
SFX 399 0 chmy .
SFX 399 0 chu .
SFX 399 0 štej .
SFX 399 0 šćo .
SFX 400 Y 15
SFX 400 0 a .
SFX 400 0 ach .
SFX 400 0 am .
SFX 400 0 ami .
SFX 400 0 e .
SFX 400 0 ej .
SFX 400 0 eje .
SFX 400 0 eju .
SFX 400 0 ow .
SFX 400 0 u .
SFX 400 0 y .
SFX 400 0 ych .
SFX 400 0 ym .
SFX 400 0 yma .
SFX 400 0 ymi .
SFX 401 Y 15
SFX 401 0 a .
SFX 401 0 ach .
SFX 401 0 am .
SFX 401 0 ami .
SFX 401 0 e .
SFX 401 0 mej .
SFX 401 0 my .
SFX 401 0 oju .
SFX 401 0 om .
SFX 401 0 oma .
SFX 401 0 ow .
SFX 401 0 owu .
SFX 401 0 tej .
SFX 401 0 u .
SFX 401 0 ćo .
SFX 402 Y 35
SFX 402 0 a .
SFX 402 0 ach .
SFX 402 0 am .
SFX 402 0 ami .
SFX 402 0 e .
SFX 402 0 eg .
SFX 402 0 ego .
SFX 402 0 ej .
SFX 402 0 eje .
SFX 402 0 eju .
SFX 402 0 em .
SFX 402 0 emu .
SFX 402 0 mej .
SFX 402 0 my .
SFX 402 0 oju .
SFX 402 0 om .
SFX 402 0 oma .
SFX 402 0 ow .
SFX 402 0 owu .
SFX 402 0 tej .
SFX 402 0 u .
SFX 402 0 y .
SFX 402 0 ych .
SFX 402 0 yjo .
SFX 402 0 yjom .
SFX 402 0 yjomej .
SFX 402 0 yjomy .
SFX 402 0 yjotej .
SFX 402 0 yjośo .
SFX 402 0 yjoš .
SFX 402 0 yju .
SFX 402 0 ym .
SFX 402 0 yma .
SFX 402 0 ymi .
SFX 402 0 ćo .
SFX 403 Y 15
SFX 403 0 a .
SFX 403 0 ach .
SFX 403 0 am .
SFX 403 0 ami .
SFX 403 0 mej .
SFX 403 0 my .
SFX 403 0 oju .
SFX 403 0 om .
SFX 403 0 oma .
SFX 403 0 ow .
SFX 403 0 owu .
SFX 403 0 tej .
SFX 403 0 u .
SFX 403 0 y .
SFX 403 0 śo .
SFX 404 Y 16
SFX 404 0 a .
SFX 404 0 ach .
SFX 404 0 am .
SFX 404 0 ami .
SFX 404 0 mej .
SFX 404 0 my .
SFX 404 0 o .
SFX 404 0 oju .
SFX 404 0 om .
SFX 404 0 oma .
SFX 404 0 ow .
SFX 404 0 owu .
SFX 404 0 tej .
SFX 404 0 u .
SFX 404 0 y .
SFX 404 0 śo .
SFX 405 Y 17
SFX 405 0 a .
SFX 405 0 ach .
SFX 405 0 am .
SFX 405 0 ami .
SFX 405 0 e .
SFX 405 0 m .
SFX 405 0 mej .
SFX 405 0 my .
SFX 405 0 oju .
SFX 405 0 om .
SFX 405 0 oma .
SFX 405 0 ow .
SFX 405 0 owu .
SFX 405 0 tej .
SFX 405 0 u .
SFX 405 0 śo .
SFX 405 0 š .
SFX 406 Y 14
SFX 406 0 a .
SFX 406 0 e .
SFX 406 0 eg .
SFX 406 0 ego .
SFX 406 0 ej .
SFX 406 0 eje .
SFX 406 0 eju .
SFX 406 0 em .
SFX 406 0 emu .
SFX 406 0 u .
SFX 406 0 ych .
SFX 406 0 ym .
SFX 406 0 yma .
SFX 406 0 ymi .
SFX 407 Y 7
SFX 407 0 ch .
SFX 407 0 chmej .
SFX 407 0 chmy .
SFX 407 0 chu .
SFX 407 0 šo .
SFX 407 0 štej .
SFX 407 0 šćo .
SFX 408 Y 7
SFX 408 0 ch .
SFX 408 0 chmej .
SFX 408 0 chmy .
SFX 408 0 chu .
SFX 408 0 šo .
SFX 408 0 štej .
SFX 408 0 šćo .
SFX 409 Y 15
SFX 409 0 a .
SFX 409 0 e .
SFX 409 0 eg .
SFX 409 0 ego .
SFX 409 0 ej .
SFX 409 0 eje .
SFX 409 0 eju .
SFX 409 0 em .
SFX 409 0 emu .
SFX 409 0 i .
SFX 409 0 u .
SFX 409 0 ych .
SFX 409 0 ym .
SFX 409 0 yma .
SFX 409 0 ymi .
SFX 410 Y 15
SFX 410 0 a .
SFX 410 0 e .
SFX 410 0 eg .
SFX 410 0 ego .
SFX 410 0 ej .
SFX 410 0 eje .
SFX 410 0 eju .
SFX 410 0 em .
SFX 410 0 emu .
SFX 410 0 u .
SFX 410 0 y .
SFX 410 0 ych .
SFX 410 0 ym .
SFX 410 0 yma .
SFX 410 0 ymi .
SFX 411 Y 15
SFX 411 0 a .
SFX 411 0 e .
SFX 411 0 eg .
SFX 411 0 ego .
SFX 411 0 ej .
SFX 411 0 eje .
SFX 411 0 eju .
SFX 411 0 em .
SFX 411 0 emu .
SFX 411 0 u .
SFX 411 0 y .
SFX 411 0 ych .
SFX 411 0 ym .
SFX 411 0 yma .
SFX 411 0 ymi .
SFX 412 Y 16
SFX 412 0 a .
SFX 412 0 e .
SFX 412 0 eg .
SFX 412 0 ego .
SFX 412 0 ej .
SFX 412 0 eje .
SFX 412 0 eju .
SFX 412 0 em .
SFX 412 0 emu .
SFX 412 0 i .
SFX 412 0 u .
SFX 412 0 y .
SFX 412 0 ych .
SFX 412 0 ym .
SFX 412 0 yma .
SFX 412 0 ymi .
SFX 413 Y 16
SFX 413 0 a .
SFX 413 0 e .
SFX 413 0 eg .
SFX 413 0 ego .
SFX 413 0 ej .
SFX 413 0 eje .
SFX 413 0 eju .
SFX 413 0 em .
SFX 413 0 emu .
SFX 413 0 o .
SFX 413 0 u .
SFX 413 0 y .
SFX 413 0 ych .
SFX 413 0 ym .
SFX 413 0 yma .
SFX 413 0 ymi .
SFX 414 Y 16
SFX 414 0 a .
SFX 414 0 e .
SFX 414 0 eg .
SFX 414 0 ego .
SFX 414 0 ej .
SFX 414 0 eje .
SFX 414 0 eju .
SFX 414 0 em .
SFX 414 0 emu .
SFX 414 0 o .
SFX 414 0 u .
SFX 414 0 y .
SFX 414 0 ych .
SFX 414 0 ym .
SFX 414 0 yma .
SFX 414 0 ymi .
SFX 415 Y 17
SFX 415 0 a .
SFX 415 0 e .
SFX 415 0 eg .
SFX 415 0 ego .
SFX 415 0 ej .
SFX 415 0 eje .
SFX 415 0 eju .
SFX 415 0 em .
SFX 415 0 emu .
SFX 415 0 i .
SFX 415 0 im .
SFX 415 0 u .
SFX 415 0 y .
SFX 415 0 ych .
SFX 415 0 ym .
SFX 415 0 yma .
SFX 415 0 ymi .
SFX 416 Y 7
SFX 416 0 o .
SFX 416 0 om .
SFX 416 0 omej .
SFX 416 0 omy .
SFX 416 0 otej .
SFX 416 0 ośo .
SFX 416 0 oš .
SFX 417 Y 28
SFX 417 0 a .
SFX 417 0 ach .
SFX 417 0 achmej .
SFX 417 0 achmy .
SFX 417 0 achu .
SFX 417 0 am .
SFX 417 0 ami .
SFX 417 0 ašo .
SFX 417 0 aštej .
SFX 417 0 ašćo .
SFX 417 0 e .
SFX 417 0 i .
SFX 417 0 im .
SFX 417 0 imej .
SFX 417 0 imy .
SFX 417 0 itej .
SFX 417 0 iśo .
SFX 417 0 iš .
SFX 417 0 mej .
SFX 417 0 my .
SFX 417 0 oju .
SFX 417 0 om .
SFX 417 0 oma .
SFX 417 0 ow .
SFX 417 0 owu .
SFX 417 0 tej .
SFX 417 0 u .
SFX 417 0 śo .
SFX 418 Y 8
SFX 418 0 e .
SFX 418 0 o .
SFX 418 0 om .
SFX 418 0 omej .
SFX 418 0 omy .
SFX 418 0 otej .
SFX 418 0 ośo .
SFX 418 0 oš .
