language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Lin/1,392
Pódmokł/1,400
Rown/1,409
Slěp/1,406
Sow/1,392
bogabójazn/1,412
bój/405
bójazn/1,412
běžn/1,412
c/1,396
camp/404
chmjel/417
chórown/1,412
cyckota/1,407
deromantizěrowa/408
dodojujuc/1,410
dognit/411
domown/1,412
dopokazn/1,412
drasć/397
druznj/1,416
dłyp/403
fajrowa/1,407
flisowan/1,415
gib/403
gnercat/411
grim/403
gromadn/1,412
głown/1,412
hamp/404
imatrikulěrowa/408
interesěrowa/1,407
jětšowš/1,410
jězdn/1,412
kap/404
kartěrowa/408
klij/417
kral/417
kringel/417
kružel/417
kurknj/1,416
kónjackowa/1,407
kósacn/1,412
kóstkowat/411
legitiměrowa/408
lej/1,390
lenj/1,418
lip/404
manźel/417
maśeŕn/1,412
moskitowš/1,410
mój/395
mól/417
nabubnaśeł/413
nacowan/1,415
nadyma/399
nadymat/411
najmj/1,418
nakisał/413
namokał/413
namydlowa/1,407
nanejkejžorcyńš/1,410
nanejpěśorakš/1,410
nanejzastojnstwowš/1,410
nanejžkaroserijowš/1,410
nanejžpózdźejš/1,410
nanejžzakósćońš/1,410
nasyp/403
nazelen/1,412
nazym/1,392
nałam/403
naźej/1,390
nejgusyńš/1,410
nejpokalowš/1,410
nejwupołožkowš/1,410
nejžgroblatš/1,410
nejžpjakarjowš/1,410
nejžwuchowš/1,410
njeaplicěrowa/408
njebudgetěrowa/1,407
njechyl/391
njedenaturěrowan/1,415
njedognit/411
njedogruntowa/408
njedonapołni/399
njedowobzamknj/1,416
njedražěrowa/1,407
njegryza/1,407
njegusarjujuc/1,410
njeinjicěrowa/408
njekipan/1,415
njeko-wuwit/411
njekoncesioněrowa/408
njemoralizěrowa/1,407
njenamaza/399
njenamoknj/1,416
njenawjertowan/1,415
njenaźej/1,390
njepikał/413
njepit/411
njepóderbje/408
njepógroni/399
njepójědankowa/1,407
njepósednj/1,416
njepósmjejkowan/1,415
njepówopśestat/411
njepśedpołožy/399
njepśejachlon/1,410
njepśetkat/411
njepśewiźe/408
njepśewóźowan/1,415
njepśeśisnj/1,416
njepśijaśel/417
njepśikšuśi/399
njepśilicowa/1,407
njerozbit/411
njerozmjetnj/1,416
njerozpyrjan/1,415
njerozženi/399
njerozžywjowa/1,407
njeseś/397
njeskal/391
njesonděrowa/408
njestrat/411
njetłukotan/1,415
njewjasel/398
njewobgrěznj/1,416
njewoblicowa/1,407
njewobmani/399
njewobpalujuc/1,410
njewobźěl/391
njewopóznat/411
njewufajrowa/408
njewujětśi/399
njewukachlickowan/1,415
njewukšadnj/1,416
njewuwjedri/399
njewuwólnjowa/1,407
njewuzdrjał/413
njewuzet/411
njewušwicowan/1,415
njewótblokowa/408
njewótgrabnj/1,416
njewótpókšyt/411
njewótpšawi/399
njezachachowa/408
njezadobydnuwan/1,415
njezagrimnj/1,416
njezajmj/1,418
njezakórjenjowa/1,407
njezamawnu/399
njezaprěł/413
njezawuknjon/1,410
njezbogatnj/1,416
njezdrjał/413
njezdušy/399
njezepśełamowan/1,415
njezeźaržowa/408
njezlat/411
njezrozbuźi/399
nješołtowan/1,415
nještricowa/1,407
pal/417
pasown/1,412
popjel/417
prochnjeł/413
puknj/1,416
póchójźon/1,410
pódkop/403
pódwjacorn/1,412
pódzym/1,392
pógib/403
pógnaźi/399
pógrim/403
pósmarcan/1,415
póstoj/405
pótupowa/1,407
pówobetrět/411
pówětš/402
pěskown/1,412
płošn/1,412
pśechórjeł/413
pśedmódli/399
pśedobydnj/1,416
pśedplanowa/408
pśejmj/1,418
pśejšł/1,414
pśewósowan/1,415
pśezdrjał/413
pśezpołdn/1,412
pśełam/403
pśigrat/411
pśijaśel/417
pśiklap/403
pśikóleba/399
pśimykota/408
pśismjejknj/1,416
pśisrěb/403
pśistarkowa/1,407
rown/1,412
rozpychan/1,415
rozštapnu/399
sanitarn/1,412
seś/397
skšyt/411
smjerźe/1,407
smycknj/1,416
spaŕn/1,412
spinj/1,418
spisowaśel/417
sprochnjeł/413
starc/402
swój/395
swójnjejš/1,410
syntetizěrowa/408
traktorn/1,412
tun/1,393
twój/395
tśakotan/1,415
tśap/403
wjasel/398
wobbrunaśeł/413
wobliza/399
wobsłužowa/1,407
woběrat/411
wobźěl/391
wokósćeł/413
wokšacnj/1,416
womanj/1,418
wugbał/413
wugib/403
wujangli/399
wukapan/1,415
wukop/403
wumanewrěrowa/408
wuprěł/413
wuzbydnj/1,416
wułam/403
wušyndowan/1,415
wuźěrał/413
wósebjowa/1,407
wóstat/411
wótkop/403
wótkósmickowa/408
wótpěźi/399
wóttśasnj/1,416
wótłam/403
wótškrab/403
wěz/401
zabywał/413
zadrap/403
zadrapowan/1,415
zagib/403
zajmj/1,418
zajtš/1,394
zakop/403
založěrowa/408
zamžerit/411
zapadowatš/1,410
zaprěł/413
zarub/403
zarubnj/1,416
zasajźowa/1,407
zawinj/1,418
zdrjał/413
zdroslowa/399
zepśiman/1,415
zgib/403
zgnił/413
zogol/417
zwit/411
zwódnjeł/413
zym/1,392
złapnj/1,416
šamp/404
špingel/417
šyfrěrowa/408
šyj/1,390
źěl/417
žarjabn/1,412
žydnjeł/413
